Washington statutes.
RCW 19.385.030

Internet consumer access account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

The internet consumer access account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from recoveries by the office of the attorney general for lawsuits related to the consumer protection act under the provisions of this chapter, or otherwise designated to this account, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for costs incurred by the office of the attorney general in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

[ 2018 c 5 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2018 c 5: See note following RCW 19.385.020.